src/twol-smj.txt
"g:k change for clitic -ge"
g:k => Vow: (%>:) (»:) (Dummy:) [ # | #: ] _ e: [ # | #: ] ; !clitic ge:k

"dd:tt and dtj, dts"
d:t <=> Vow: _ d: Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
	Vow: d: _  Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
KEEPIF(SHORTCOMP)
	Vow: _   d:0 Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !first part of compounds
ENDKEEP
	Vow: (»:) _ t [ j|s ] (%>:) (»:) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;


!"Gradation Series 6, III-II, bb, gg 1"
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ Cz: Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
! where Cx in ( b d g )
!       Cy in ( p t k )
!       Cz in ( b d g )
!       matched ;

!"Gradation Series 6, III-II, bb, gg 2"
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: :Cy _ Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
! where Cx in ( b d g )
!       Cy in ( p t k )
!       matched ;

"Gradation Series 7, III-II, ks(t), kt, ktj, kts"
 k:v <=> Vow: _ [ s|t ] (t) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
	 Vow: _ t [ j|s ] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;

! Exceptional II-III inverse gradation in present participles
! -----------------------------------------------------------

! This gradation is only for II-I syllable verbs that get III as
! present participles.

! Candidates:
!! bbm - bm - m
!! ddn - dn - n
!! ddnj- dnj- nj
!! ggŋ - gŋ - ŋ
!! ddj - dj - dj

!! hkk - hk - g
!! hpp - hp - b

!! htt - ht - d
!! httj- htj- tj
!! htts- hts- ts

! Strategy: Do insertion rule for the initial element.

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with bm,gŋ"
 0:Cx <=> :Vow+ _ Cx Cy Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;
      where Cx in ( b g )
            Cy in ( m ŋ )
	    matched ;

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with dn/j"
 0:d <=> :Vow+ _ d [ n | n j | j ] Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with hk, hp,"
 0:Cx <=> :Vow+ h _ Cx Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;
      where Cx in ( k p ) ;

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with htt(j/s)"
 0:t <=> :Vow+ h _ t (j|s) Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ; !removed Q7, fixed in smj-lex

"Consonant insertion as I-III strengthening gradation with d"
 0:d <=> :Vow+ _ d Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;



!Did more changes to the ñ issue: Replaced ñ with all three n-s also when it alternated with other letters.
!In the cases where ñ was the one to be deleted, in the context of double ñ, we made Cx / Cy variables, e.g. like !this:
